Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2371.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 3, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-332, to read: START_STATUTE25-332. Divorce proceedings; artificial intelligence-assisted arbitration; appeal; definition A. Parties to a divorce proceeding may use artificial intelligence-assisted arbitration only if both of the following apply: 1. Both parties provide written consent to the artificial intelligence-assisted arbitration and to WHETHER the proceeding will result in a recommendation or a BINDING determination. 2. The parties do not share minor children. B. Either party may withdraw the consent described in subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section at any time before the issuance of a recommendation or binding determination. C. A binding determination that is issued in an artificial intelligence-assisted arbitration is appealable to the superior court that would otherwise have jurisdiction over the matter by filing a notice of appeal within twenty judicial days after the issuance of the recommendation or binding determination.  On appeal, the superior court shall adjudicate the case, de novo, as to both the law and the facts, and without consideration of the proceedings in the artificial intelligence-assisted arbitration.  This subsection does not limit any right to further appeal. D. A binding determination that is issued in an artificial intelligence-assisted arbitration may be entered by any court having jurisdiction of the matter. E. For the purposes of this section, "artificial intelligence-assisted arbitration" means a computational system that: 1. Applies governing laws to disclosed facts. 2. Generates recommendations or binding determinations regarding divorce-related issues. 3. Is not a legal person and does not exercise independent legal authority. END_STATUTE